src/morphology/affixes/interjections.lexc
!! Interjections

!! The MOKSHA language interjections

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! INTERJECTIONS 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! ============ !
! Interj lexica !
! ============ !

LEXICON INTERJ_
: K ;

!LEXICON Interj-Imp !!= @CODE@ орхт
!+Interj+Imprt+ScSg2: K ;
!+Interj+Imprt+ScPl2:%>да K ;

LEXICON FORMULAIC_
+Formulaic: K ;

LEXICON INTERJ-NEG
+Interj+Neg: # ;

LEXICON VOCATIVE_ !!= @CODE@ should these really be interjections? 2018-11-10
+Voc: K ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
